Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-543
Policy; binder issued pending issuance of policy.

Any binder issued pending the issuance of a motor vehicle liability policy shall be deemed to fulfill the requirements for such a policy.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 43, p. 498.